Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF585.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2482YH (1) 91 jda/jh H.F. 585 Section 1. Section 279.23, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0e. If the contract provides for one or 3 more severance payments, a statement that the administrator 4 shall not receive such payments if the contract is terminated 5 as a result of the administrator being found guilty in a 6 criminal proceeding on a charge relating to the administratorâs 7 official duties or a dereliction thereof for which the period 8 for appeal has passed, other than a proceeding regarding a 9 simple misdemeanor or a parking violation as defined in section 10 321.210. 11 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to contracts 12 entered into pursuant to section 279.23, or continued pursuant 13 to section 279.24, on or after the effective date of this Act. 14